Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.100

Disciplinary action—Grounds.

The following constitutes grounds for disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW:

(1) Any form of fraud or deceit used in securing a license; or

(2) Any unprofessional conduct, of a nature likely to deceive or defraud the public; or

(3) The employing either directly or indirectly of any person or persons commonly known as "cappers" or "steerers" to obtain business; or

(4) To employ any person to solicit from house to house, or to personally solicit from house to house; or

(5) Advertisement in any way in which untruthful, improbable or impossible statements are made regarding treatments, cures or values; or

(6) The use of the term "eye specialist" in connection with the name of such optometrist; or

(7) Inability to demonstrate, in a manner satisfactory to the secretary or the board of optometry, their practical ability to perform any function set forth in RCW 18.53.010 which they utilize in their practice.

[ 1991 c 3 s 137; 1986 c 259 s 81; 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 6; 1919 c 144 s 11; RRS s 10156. Prior: 1909 c 235 ss 11, 12.]

NOTES:

Savings—1986 c 259 ss 81 and 85: "The repeal of RCW 18.53.020 and the amendment of RCW 18.53.100 by this act shall not be construed as affecting any rights and duties which matured, penalties which were incurred, and proceedings which were begun before June 11, 1986." [ 1986 c 259 s 86.]

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

False advertising: Chapter 9.04 RCW.

Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act—Suspension of license: RCW 69.50.413.